California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
In a case where the residence of a dependent child of the juvenile court is out of the state and in another state or foreign country, or in a case where that child is a resident of this state but his or her parents, relatives, guardian, or person charged with his or her custody is in another state, the court may order that child sent to his or her parents, relatives, or guardian, or to the person charged with his or her custody, or, if the child is a resident of a foreign country, to an official of a juvenile court of that foreign country or an agency of a country authorized to accept the child, and in that case may order transportation and accommodation furnished, with or without an attendant, as the court deems necessary. If the court deems an attendant necessary, the court may order the social worker or other suitable person to serve as the attendant. The social worker shall authorize the necessary expenses of the child and of the attendant and claims therefor shall be audited, allowed and paid in the same manner as other county claims.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1054, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

369.

(a) (1) If a person is taken into temporary custody under Article 7 (commencing with Section 305) and is in need of medical, surgical, dental, or other remedial care, the social worker may, upon the recommendation of the attending physician and surgeon or, if the person needs dental care and there is an attending dentist, the attending dentist, authorize the performance of the medical, surgical, dental, or other remedial care.

(2) The social worker shall notify the parent, guardian, or person standing in loco parentis of the person, if any, of the care found to be needed before that care is provided, and if the parent, guardian, or person standing in loco parentis objects, that care shall be given only upon order of the court in the exercise of
 its discretion.

(b) If it appears to the juvenile court that a person concerning whom a petition has been filed with the court is in need of medical, surgical, dental, or other remedial care, and that there is no parent, guardian, or person standing in loco parentis capable of authorizing or willing to authorize the remedial care or treatment for that person, the court, upon the written recommendation of a licensed physician and surgeon or, if the person needs dental care, a licensed dentist, and after due notice to the parent, guardian, or person standing in loco parentis, if any, may make an order authorizing the performance of the necessary medical, surgical, dental, or other remedial care for that person.

(c) If a dependent child of the juvenile court is placed by order of the court within the care and custody or under the supervision of a social worker of the county where the
 dependent child resides and it appears to the court that there is no parent, guardian, or person standing in loco parentis capable of authorizing or willing to authorize medical, surgical, dental, or other remedial care or treatment for the dependent child, the court may, after due notice to the parent, guardian, or person standing in loco parentis, if any, order that the social worker may authorize the medical, surgical, dental, or other remedial care for the dependent child, by licensed practitioners, as necessary.

(d) (1) If it appears that a child otherwise within subdivision (a), (b), or (c) requires immediate emergency medical, surgical, or other remedial care in an emergency situation, that care may be provided by a licensed physician and surgeon or, if the child needs dental care in an emergency situation, by a licensed dentist, without a court order and upon authorization of a social worker.

(2) The social worker shall make reasonable efforts to obtain the consent of, or to notify, the parent, guardian, or person standing in loco parentis prior to authorizing emergency medical, surgical, dental, or other remedial care.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “emergency situation” means a child requires immediate treatment for the alleviation of severe pain or an immediate diagnosis and treatment of an unforeseeable medical, surgical, dental, or other remedial condition or contagious disease that, if not immediately diagnosed and treated, would lead to serious disability or death.

(e) If the court orders the performance of a medical, surgical, dental, or other remedial care pursuant to this section, the court may also make an order authorizing the release of information concerning that care to a social worker,
 parole officer, or other qualified individual or agency caring for or acting in the interest and welfare of the child under order, commitment, or approval of the court.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision within this section, a dependent child of the juvenile court who is 16 years of age or older may consent to receive medications for opioid use disorder from a licensed narcotic treatment program as replacement narcotic therapy without the consent of their parent, guardian, person standing in loco parentis, or social worker, and without a court order, only if, and to the extent, expressly permitted by federal law.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, a dependent child of the juvenile court who is 16 years of age or older may consent to opioid use disorder treatment that uses buprenorphine at a physician’s office, clinic, or health facility, by a
 licensed physician and surgeon or other health care provider acting within the scope of their practice, whether or not they have the consent of their parent, guardian, person standing in loco parentis, or social worker and without a court order.

(g) This section does not limit the right of a parent, guardian, or person standing in loco parentis, who has not been deprived of the custody or control of the child by order of the court, in providing a medical, surgical, dental, or other remedial treatment recognized or permitted under the laws of this state.

(h) (1) The parent of a person described in this section may authorize the performance of medical, surgical, dental, or other remedial care provided for in this section notwithstanding their age or marital status.

(2) In a nonemergency situation,
 the parent authorizing the care shall notify the other parent prior to the administration of that care.

(i) (1) This section does not limit the rights of a dependent child, pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 6920) of Part 4 of Division 11 of the Family Code, to consent to, among other things, the diagnosis and treatment of sexual assault, medical care relating to the prevention or treatment of pregnancy, including contraception, abortion, and prenatal care, treatment of infectious, contagious, or communicable diseases, mental health treatment, and treatment for alcohol and drug abuse.

(2) If a dependent child is 10 years of age or older, their social worker is authorized to inform the child of their right as a minor to consent to and receive those health services, as necessary, and their confidentiality rights regarding those services.

(3) A social worker for a dependent child may do either or both of the following:

(A) Provide access to age-appropriate, medically accurate information about sexual development, reproductive health, and prevention of unplanned pregnancies and sexually transmitted infections and how to access reproductive and sexual health care services.

(B) Facilitate access to the care described in subparagraph (A), including assisting with any barriers to care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 936, Sec. 1.   (AB 866)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

369.5.

(a) (1) If a child is adjudged a dependent child of the court under Section 300 and the child has been removed from the physical custody of the parent under Section 361, only a juvenile court judicial officer shall have authority to make orders regarding the administration of psychotropic medications for that child. The juvenile court may issue a specific order delegating this authority to a parent upon making findings on the record that the parent poses no danger to the child and has the capacity to authorize psychotropic medications. Court authorization for the administration of psychotropic medication shall be based on a request from a physician, indicating the reasons for the request, a description of the child’s diagnosis and behavior, the expected results of the medication, and a description of any
 side effects of the medication.

(2) (A) The Judicial Council shall amend and adopt rules of court and develop appropriate forms for the implementation of this section, in consultation with the State Department of Social Services, the State Department of Health Care Services, and stakeholders, including, but not limited to, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, the Chief Probation Officers of California, associations representing current and former foster children, caregivers, and children’s attorneys. This effort shall be undertaken in coordination with the updates required under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 739.5.

(B) The rules of court and forms developed pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall address all of the following:

(i) The child and their caregiver and court-appointed special advocate, if any, have an opportunity to provide input on the medications being prescribed.

(ii) Information regarding the child’s overall mental health assessment and treatment plan is provided to the court.

(iii) Information regarding the rationale for the proposed medication, provided in the context of past and current treatment efforts, is provided to the court. This information shall include, but not be limited to, information on other pharmacological and nonpharmacological treatments that have been utilized and the child’s response to those treatments, a discussion of symptoms not alleviated or ameliorated by other current or past treatment efforts, and an explanation of how the psychotropic medication being prescribed is expected to improve the child’s
 symptoms.

(iv) Guidance is provided to the court on how to evaluate the request for authorization, including how to proceed if information, otherwise required to be included in a request for authorization under this section, is not included in a request for authorization submitted to the court.

(C) The rules of court and forms developed pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall include a process for periodic oversight by the court of orders regarding the administration of psychotropic medications that includes the caregiver’s and child’s observations regarding the effectiveness of the medication and side effects, information on medication management appointments and other followup appointments with medical practitioners, and information on the delivery of other mental health treatments that are a part of the child’s overall treatment plan. The periodic oversight shall be facilitated by
 the county social worker, public health nurse, or other appropriate county staff. This oversight process shall be conducted in conjunction with other regularly scheduled court hearings and reports provided to the court by the county child welfare agency.

(D) (i) By September 1, 2020, the forms developed pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall include a request for authorization by the child or the child’s attorney to release the child’s medical information to the Medical Board of California in order to ascertain whether there is excessive prescribing of psychotropic medication that is inconsistent with the standard of care described in Section 2245 of the Business and Professions Code. The authorization shall be limited to medical information relevant to the investigation of the prescription of psychotropic medication, and the information may only be used for the purpose set forth in this subparagraph and Section 2245 of the
 Business and Professions Code.

(ii) The Medical Board of California or its representative shall request the medical information obtained pursuant to this section to be sealed if the medical information is admitted as an exhibit in an administrative hearing pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(iii) In updating the forms, as required by this subparagraph and subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 739.5, the Judicial Council shall consult with the State Department of Social Services, the Medical Board of California, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the Chief Probation Officers of California, and groups representing foster children, dependency counsel, and children’s advocates to help ensure that the child and the child’s attorney are provided with sufficient
 information to understand the request for authorization to obtain the child’s medical information and the reasons for the request. The Judicial Council may include in the form a requirement that the person completing the form affirm that the child or child’s attorney has been asked about the authorization.

(iv) (I) By January 1, 2020, the State Department of Social Services shall convene a working group consisting of the Judicial Council, the Medical Board of California, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the Chief Probation Officers of California, and groups representing foster children, dependency counsel, and children’s advocates to consider various options for seeking authorization from a dependent child, a ward, or their attorney, for release of the dependent child’s or ward’s medical information regarding psychotropic medication prescribed between January 1, 2017, and July 1, 2020, and shall
 report to the Legislature by April 15, 2020, on those options and on any recommendations to best reach those children and their attorneys to seek authorization.

(II) (ia) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subclause (I) is inoperative on January 1, 2024, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(ib) A report to be submitted pursuant to subclause (I) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(b) (1) In counties in which the county child welfare agency completes the request for authorization for the administration of psychotropic medication, the agency is encouraged to complete the request within three business days of receipt from the physician of the information necessary to fully
 complete the request.

(2) This subdivision does not change current local practice or local court rules with respect to the preparation and submission of requests for authorization for the administration of psychotropic medication.

(c) (1) Within seven court days from receipt by the court of a completed request, the juvenile court judicial officer shall either approve or deny in writing a request for authorization for the administration of psychotropic medication to the child, or shall, upon a request by the parent, the legal guardian, or the child’s attorney, or upon its own motion, set the matter for hearing.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding Section 827 or any other law, upon
 the approval or denial by the juvenile court judicial officer of a request for authorization for the administration of psychotropic medication, the county child welfare agency or other person or entity who submitted the request shall provide a copy of the court order approving or denying the request to the child’s caregiver.

(B) If the court approves the request, the copy of the order shall include the last two pages of form JV-220(A) or the last two pages of JV-220(B) and all medication information sheets that were attached to form JV-220(A) or form JV-220(B), which are all referenced in Rule 5.640 of the California Rules of Court.

(C) If the child changes placement, the social worker or
 probation officer shall provide the new caregiver with a copy of the order, including the last two pages of form JV-220(A) or the last two pages of JV-220(B), and the medication information sheets that were attached to form JV-220(A) or form JV-220(B), which are all referenced in Rule 5.640 of the California Rules of Court.

(d) Psychotropic medication or psychotropic drugs are those medications administered for the purpose of affecting the central nervous system to treat psychiatric disorders or illnesses. These medications include, but are not limited to, anxiolytic agents, antidepressants, mood stabilizers, antipsychotic medications, anti-Parkinson agents, hypnotics, medications for dementia, and psychostimulants.

(e) This section does not supersede local court rules regarding a minor’s right to participate in mental health decisions.

(f) This section does not apply to nonminor dependents, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 812, Sec. 1.   (SB 528)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

369.6.

(a) (1) The State Department of Social Services, in consultation with the State Department of Health Care Services, shall contract for child psychiatry services to complete a record review for all authorization requests for psychotropic medications for which a second opinion review is requested by a county. To the extent feasible, the second opinion review shall occur within three business days of the county request and shall include discussion of the psychosocial interventions that have been or will be offered to the child and caretaker, if appropriate, to address the behavioral health needs of the child.

(2) (A) Recommended indicators for identifying those requests for authorizations of psychotropic
 medications for which a county may request a second opinion record review may include, but are not limited to, prescriptions for concurrent psychotropic medications, dosages that exceed recommended guidelines for use in children, off-label prescribing, and requests for psychotropic medication usage without any other concurrent psychosocial services.

(B) The State Department of Social Services shall, by July 1, 2018, issue guidance regarding the second opinion review process and may periodically revise that guidance following consultation with counties, other state departments, advocates for children and youth, and other stakeholders.

(3) The child psychiatry services contracted for by the State Department of Social Services shall be available to provide second opinion reviews to those counties that do not have a second opinion review program. This section does not prohibit a
 county from operating its own second opinion review program and does not supersede any county-operated second opinion review program.

(4) This section does not prevent the administration of medication in an emergency, as otherwise authorized or required by law or regulation.

(b) The State Department of Health Care Services shall seek any necessary federal approvals to obtain federal financial participation for the second opinion review service pursuant to this section, including any approvals necessary to obtain enhanced federal financial participation as applicable. Notwithstanding any other law, this section shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, any necessary federal approvals are obtained by the department and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 24, Sec. 11.   (SB 89)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

370.

The juvenile court may, in any case before it in which a petition has been filed as provided in Article 7 (commencing with Section 305), order that the social worker obtain the services of those psychiatrists, psychologists, or other clinical experts as may be required to assist in determining the appropriate treatment of the child and as may be required in the conduct or implementation of that treatment. Payment for those services shall be a charge against the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1054, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

371.

When the court has ordered a dependent child or a ward of the juvenile court placed for adoption or has appointed a relative or nonrelative legal guardian, the social worker or probation officer shall provide the prospective adoptive family or the guardian or guardians information, in writing, regarding the importance of working with mental health providers that have specialized adoption or permanency clinical training and experience if the family needs clinical support, and a description of the desirable clinical expertise the family should look for when choosing an adoption- or permanency-competent mental health professional.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 714, Sec. 1.   (AB 1006)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Dependent Children—Transfer of Cases Between Counties [375. - 381.]

375.

(a) Whenever a petition is filed in the juvenile court of a county other than the residence of the person named in the petition, or whenever, subsequent to the filing of a petition in the juvenile court of the county where that minor resides, the residence of the person who would be legally entitled to the custody of the minor were it not for the existence of a court order issued pursuant to this chapter is changed to another county, the entire case may be transferred to the juvenile court of the county where that person then resides at any time after the court has made a finding of the facts upon which it has exercised its jurisdiction over the minor, and the juvenile court of the county where that person then resides shall take jurisdiction of the
 case upon the receipt and filing of the finding of the facts upon which the court exercised its jurisdiction and an order transferring the case.

(b) (1) (A) Whenever a minor under the dependency jurisdiction or transition jurisdiction of the juvenile court attains 18 years of age and remains under the court’s jurisdiction as a nonminor dependent, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, the residence of the nonminor dependent may be changed to another county if the court finds that the nonminor dependent meets either of the following conditions:

(i) The conditions set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 17.1.

(ii) The nonminor dependent requests the transfer of jurisdiction to
 a new county and the court finds that the transfer is in the best interest of the nonminor dependent. In making its determination, the court shall consider all relevant information, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(I) Whether the transfer would enhance the nonminor dependent’s access to services.

(II) The position of the social worker or a tribal social worker and, if applicable, the probation officer.

(III) Whether the nonminor dependent would qualify as a resident of the new county pursuant to Section 244 of the Government Code, Section 12505 of the Vehicle Code, or Section 48204.1 of
 the Education Code.

(IV) Whether the nonminor dependent has established significant connections to the new county through employment or independent contracting, through enrollment in an educational or vocational program, through obtaining housing, or through establishing family or other supportive connections in the new county, including relationships that provide emotional or social support to the nonminor dependent, such as relationships with family members, mentors, close friends, or community ties, such as being a member of a religious congregation or nonprofit organization.

(V) Whether the nonminor dependent is involved in a separate dependency case as a parent in the new county.

(B) (i) Pursuant
 to subparagraph (A), the entire case may be ordered to be transferred to the juvenile court of the county where the nonminor dependent then resides at any time after the court has made a finding of the facts upon which the court has exercised its jurisdiction over the nonminor dependent or at a regularly scheduled review hearing pursuant to Section 366.31. The juvenile court of the county where a nonminor then resides shall take jurisdiction of the case upon the receipt and filing of that finding and an order transferring the case.

(ii) A court issuing an order to transfer the case pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) shall issue the order within 30
 court days of the nonminor dependent’s request.

(iii) If the court issues an order to transfer the case, the new county shall be deemed to have jurisdiction over the nonminor dependent within 10 calendar days of the issuance of the order.

(2) Whenever a petition pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 388 is submitted in the juvenile court of a county other than the county that retained general jurisdiction under subdivision (b) of Section 303 of the nonminor dependent, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, the residence of the nonminor dependent may be changed to another county if the nonminor dependent meets the conditions of subdivision (g) of Section 17.1. The entire case may be transferred to the juvenile court of the county where the nonminor
 dependent then resides at any time after the county that retained general jurisdiction has granted the petition and resumed dependency jurisdiction, or has assumed or resumed transition jurisdiction. The juvenile court of the county where the nonminor then resides shall take jurisdiction of the case upon the receipt and filing of the finding of the facts upon which the court exercised its jurisdiction over the nonminor and an order transferring the case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 281, Sec. 3.   (AB 890)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

376.

The expense of the transfer and all expenses in connection with the transfer and for the support and maintenance of such person shall be paid from the county treasury of the court ordering the transfer until the receipt and filing of the finding and order of transfer in the juvenile court of the transferee county.

The judge shall inquire into the financial condition of such person and of the parent, parents, guardian, or other person charged with his support and maintenance, and if he finds such person, parent, parents, guardian, or other person able, in whole or in part, to pay the expense of such transfer, he shall make a further order requiring such person, parent, parents, guardian, or other person to repay to the county such part, or all, of such expense of transfer as, in the opinion of the court, is proper. Such repayment shall be made to the probation officer who shall keep suitable accounts of such expenses and repayments and shall deposit all such collections in the county treasury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

377.

Whenever a case is transferred as provided in Section 375, the order of transfer shall recite each and all of the findings, orders, or modification of orders that have been made in the case, and shall include the name and address of the legal residence of the parent or guardian of the minor. All papers contained in the file shall be transferred to the county where such person resides. A copy of the order of transfer and of the findings of fact as required in Section 375 shall be kept in the file of the transferring county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

378.

Whenever an order of transfer from another county is filed with the clerk of any juvenile court, the clerk shall place the transfer order on the calendar of the court, and it shall have precedence over all actions and civil proceedings not specifically given precedence by other provisions of law and shall be heard by the court at the earliest possible moment following the filing of the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

379.

In any action under the provisions of this article in which the residence of a minor person is determined, both the county in which the court is situated and any other county which, as a result of the determination of residence, might be determined to be the county of residence of the minor person, shall be considered to be parties in the action and shall have the right to appeal any order by which residence of the minor person is determined.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

380.

Any person adjudged to be a dependent child of the juvenile court may be permitted by order of the court to reside in a county other than the county of his or her legal residence, and the court shall retain jurisdiction over that person.

Whenever a dependent child of the juvenile court is permitted to reside in a county other than the county of his or her legal residence, he or she may be placed under the supervision of the social worker of the county of actual residence, with the consent of the social worker. The dependent child shall comply with the instructions of the social worker and upon failure to do so shall be returned to the county of his or her legal residence for further hearing and order of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1054, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

381.

(a) If a case is dismissed by a state court because the child is already a ward of a tribal court or the tribe has exclusive jurisdiction over Indian child custody proceedings pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 305.5, the state court shall ensure that all state court records are transmitted to the tribal court pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 305.5. The state court and the tribe shall each document the finding of the facts supporting jurisdiction over the minor. The state court and the county welfare department shall maintain a copy of the order of dismissal and the findings of fact.

(b) If a case is transferred from a state court to a tribal court pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 305.5, the state court shall issue an order of
 transfer of the case that states all of the findings, orders, or modification of orders that have been made in the case, and the name and address of the tribe having jurisdiction. All papers contained in the file shall be transferred to the tribe having jurisdiction. The transferring state court and county welfare department shall maintain a copy of the order of transfer and the findings of fact.

(c) If an order of transfer from a state court to a tribe is filed with the clerk of a juvenile court, the clerk shall place the transfer order on the calendar of the court, and, notwithstanding Section 378, that matter shall have precedence over all actions and civil proceedings not specifically given precedence by any other law and shall be heard by the court at the earliest possible moment after the order is filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 833, Sec. 33.   (AB 3176)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Dependent Children—Modification of Juvenile Court Judgments and Orders [385. - 391.]

385.

Any order made by the court in the case of any person subject to its jurisdiction may at any time be changed, modified, or set aside, as the judge deems meet and proper, subject to such procedural requirements as are imposed by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

386.

No order changing, modifying, or setting aside a previous order of the juvenile court shall be made either in chambers, or otherwise, unless prior notice of the application therefor has been given by the judge or the clerk of the court to the social worker and to the child’s counsel of record, or, if there is no counsel of record, to the child and his or her parent or guardian.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1054, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

387.

(a) An order changing or modifying a previous order by removing a child from the physical custody of a parent, guardian, relative, or friend and directing placement in a foster home, or commitment to a private or county institution, shall be made only after noticed hearing upon a supplemental petition.

(b) The supplemental petition shall be filed by the social worker in the original matter and shall contain a concise statement of facts sufficient to support the conclusion that the previous disposition has not been effective in the rehabilitation or protection of the child or, in the case of a placement with a relative, sufficient to show that the
 placement is not appropriate in view of the criteria in Section 361.3.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), dependency jurisdiction shall be resumed for a child as to whom dependency jurisdiction has been suspended pursuant to Section 366.5 if the jurisdiction established pursuant to Section 601 or 602 is terminated and if, after the issuance of a joint assessment pursuant to Section 366.5, the court determines that the court’s dependency jurisdiction should be resumed.

(d) Upon the filing of the supplemental petition, the clerk of the juvenile court shall immediately set the same for hearing within 30 days, and the social worker shall cause notice thereof to be served upon the persons and in the manner prescribed by Sections 290.1 and 291, except that service under this
 subdivision may be delivered by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5.

(e) An order for the detention of the child pending adjudication of the petition may be made only after a hearing is conducted pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 305).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 135.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

388.

(a) (1) Any parent or other person having an interest in a child who is a dependent child of the juvenile court or a nonminor dependent as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, or the child or the nonminor dependent through a properly appointed guardian may, upon grounds of change of circumstance or new evidence, petition the court in the same action in which the child was found to be a dependent child of the juvenile court or in which a guardianship was ordered pursuant to Section 360 for a hearing to change, modify, or set aside any order of court previously made or to terminate the jurisdiction of the court. The petition shall be verified and, if made by a person other than the child or the nonminor dependent, shall
 state the petitioner’s relationship to or interest in the child or the nonminor dependent and shall set forth in concise language any change of circumstance or new evidence that is alleged to require the change of order or termination of jurisdiction.

(2) When any party, including a child who is a dependent of the juvenile court, petitions the court prior to an order terminating parental rights, to modify the order that reunification services were not needed pursuant to paragraphs (4), (5), and (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 361.5, or to modify any orders related to custody or visitation of the subject child, and the court orders a hearing pursuant to subdivision (d), the court shall modify the order that reunification services were not needed pursuant to paragraphs (4), (5), and (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 361.5, or any orders
 related to the custody or visitation of the child for whom reunification services were not ordered pursuant to paragraphs (4), (5), and (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 361.5, only if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the proposed change is in the best interests of the child.

(b) (1) Any person, including a child or a nonminor dependent who is a dependent of the juvenile court, may petition the court to assert a relationship as a sibling related by blood, adoption, or affinity through a common legal or biological parent to a child who is, or is the subject of a petition for adjudication as, a dependent of the juvenile court, and may request visitation with the dependent child, placement with or near the dependent child, or consideration when determining or implementing a case plan or permanent plan
 for the dependent child or make any other request for an order which may be shown to be in the best interest of the dependent child.

(2) A child or nonminor dependent who is a dependent of the juvenile court may petition the court to assert a relationship as a sibling related by blood, adoption, or affinity through a common legal or biological parent to a child who is in the physical custody of a common legal or biological parent, and may request visitation with the nondependent sibling in parental custody.

(3) Pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 16002, a request for sibling visitation may be granted unless it is determined by the court that sibling visitation is contrary to the safety and well-being of any of the siblings.

(4) The court may appoint a guardian ad litem to file the petition for a dependent child asserting a sibling relationship pursuant to this subdivision if the court determines that the appointment is necessary for the best interests of the dependent child. The petition shall be verified and shall set forth the following:

(A) Through which parent the dependent child is related to the sibling.

(B) Whether the dependent child is related to the sibling by blood, adoption, or affinity.

(C) The request or order that the petitioner is seeking.

(D) Why that request or order is in the best interest of the dependent child.

(c) (1) Any party, including a child who is a dependent of the juvenile court, may petition the court, prior to the hearing set pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 366.21 for a child described by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 361.5, or prior to the hearing set pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 366.21 for a child described by subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 361.5, to terminate court-ordered reunification services provided under subdivision (a) of Section 361.5 only if one of the following conditions exists:

(A) It appears that a change of circumstance or new evidence exists that satisfies a condition set forth in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 361.5 justifying termination of court-ordered reunification
 services.

(B) The action or inaction of the parent or guardian creates a substantial likelihood that reunification will not occur, including, but not limited to, the parent’s or guardian’s failure to visit the child, or the failure of the parent or guardian to participate regularly and make substantive progress in a court-ordered treatment plan.

(2) In determining whether the parent or guardian has failed to visit the child or participate regularly or make progress in the treatment plan, the court shall consider factors that include, but are not limited to, the parent’s or guardian’s incarceration, institutionalization, detention by the United States Department of Homeland Security, deportation, or participation in a court-ordered residential substance abuse treatment program.

(3) The court shall terminate reunification services during the above-described time periods only upon a finding by a preponderance of evidence that reasonable services have been offered or provided, and upon a finding of clear and convincing evidence that one of the conditions in subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) exists.
